Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
508C

UNIFORM
ENVIRONMENTAL COVENANTS ACT

Section

508C-1 Short title

508C-2 Definitions

508C-3 Nature of rights; subordination of
interests

508C-4 Contents of environmental covenant

508C-5 Validity; effect on other instruments

508C-6 Relationship to other land use law

508C-7 Notice

508C-8 Recording

508C-9 Duration; amendment by court action

508C-10 Amendment or termination by consent

508C-11 Enforcement of environmental covenant

508C-12 Registry

508C-13 Relation to Electronic Signatures in
Global and

National Commerce Act

Cross References

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next